Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.802

Residential housing—Standard energy code plan.

The office of regulatory innovation and assistance shall contract with a qualified external consultant or entity to develop a standard energy code plan set demonstrating a prescriptive compliance pathway that will meet or exceed all energy code regulations for residential housing in the state subject to the international residential code. The standard energy code plan set may be used, but is not required, by local governments and building industries. In developing the standard energy code plan set, the consultant shall, at a minimum, seek feedback from cities, counties, building industries, and building officials. The standard energy code plan set must be completed by June 30, 2025.

[ 2024 c 183 s 3.]